Utah statutes.
73-10e-3.   Requirement to provide engineering studies.

Local government entities in which the projects described in Subsection 73-10e-1(4)(c)(i)(A) and Subsection 73-10e-1(4)(d) are located, shall immediately make all engineering studies which may be useful for the final design and construction of the projects, available to the state at no cost to the state.

